Idaho, session 2025, S1049.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1114, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-409, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-409. ELECTRONIC REGISTRATION. (1) The office of the secretary of
state may create and maintain an electronic system for voter registration
that is publicly available on its official website. Any qualified elector
who has a current valid driver's license or identification card issued pur-
suant to title 49, Idaho Code, that reflects the person's current princi-
pal place of residence, may register to vote by submitting a completed voter
registration application electronically through such website. Electronic
voter registration applications shall be submitted before the close of reg-
istration as provided in section 34-408, Idaho Code.
(2) The electronic voter registration application shall be in a form
prescribed by the secretary of state and shall:
(a) Require the information under oath or affirmation set forth in sec-
tion 34-411, Idaho Code;
(b) Include notice of the requirement to provide personal identifica-
tion before voting at the polls as set forth in sections section 34-1113
and 34-1114, Idaho Code; and
(c) Require an electronic signature of the applicant.
(3) The office of the secretary of state shall obtain a digital copy
of the applicant's driver's license or identification card signature from
the Idaho transportation department. The Idaho transportation department
shall, upon request of the office of the secretary of state, provide a dig-
ital copy of the applicant's driver's license or identification card signa-
ture.
(4) Upon receipt of a completed voter registration application and a
digital copy of the applicant's driver's license or identification card sig-
nature from the Idaho transportation department, the office of the secre-
tary of state shall send the information to the county clerk for the county


in which the applicant resides. The county clerk shall prepare and issue to
each elector registering electronically a verification of registration con-
taining the name and residence of the elector and the name or number of the
precinct in which the elector resides. Such verification of registration
may be sent by nonforwardable first-class first class mail or by electronic
mail at the elector's option. If a verification is returned undeliverable,
then the county clerk shall remove the elector from the register of electors.
(5) An applicant using the electronic system for voter registration
pursuant to this section shall not be required to complete a printed regis-
tration card.
(6) The office of the secretary of state shall use such security mea-
sures necessary to ensure the accuracy and integrity of an electronically
submitted voter registration application.
SECTION 3. That Section 34-1012, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1012. ALTERNATIVE PROCEDURES FOR ABSENTEE VOTING -- EARLY VOT-
ING. (1) Those counties that utilize absentee voting facilities that have
access to the Idaho statewide voter registration system and count ballots at
a central location or utilize a polling location-based tabulation system may
elect to conduct "early voting" according to the provisions of this section.
For those counties that elect to do "early voting," early voting shall begin
on or before the third Monday before the election and end at 5:00 p.m. on
the Friday before the election. Primary election ballots shall be issued
pursuant to section 34-1002(2), Idaho Code.
(2) A voter who appears at an "early voting" station to vote shall state
his or her name and address to the election official and present the voter's
identification as required by sections section 34-1113 and 34-1114, Idaho
Code.
(3) The election official shall examine the records to ascertain
whether or not such applicant is registered and lawfully entitled to vote
as requested. The provisions of section 34-408A, Idaho Code, authorizing
election day registration shall also apply in determining the applicant's
qualifications to vote.
(4) Before receiving a ballot, each elector shall sign his or her name
in the election register and poll book provided for early voting.
(5) The elector shall then be given the appropriate ballots contain-
ing the official election ballot identification pursuant to section 34-901,
Idaho Code, and shall be given folding instructions for such ballots, if ap-
propriate.
(6) Upon receipt of the ballots, the elector shall retire to a vacant
voting booth and mark the ballots according to the instructions provided.
(7) After marking the ballot, the elector shall present himself or her-
self to the election official at the ballot box and state his or her name and
address. The elector shall then deposit the ballot in the ballot box or hand
it to the election official, who shall deposit it. The election official
shall then record that the elector has voted and proclaim the same in an audi-
ble voice.
(8) Voters requiring assistance shall be provided with such assistance
in accordance with section 34-1108, Idaho Code.


(9) Electioneering is prohibited at an early voting polling place as
provided in section 18-2318, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. That Section 34-1106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1106. SIGNING COMBINATION ELECTION RECORD AND POLL BOOK -- DELIV-
ERY OF BALLOT TO ELECTOR. (1) An elector desiring to vote shall state his
name and address to the judge or clerk in charge of the combination election
record and poll book.
(2) Before receiving his ballot, each elector shall sign his name in
the combination election record and poll book following his name therein
and show a valid photo identification as provided for in section 34-1113,
Idaho Code, or personal identification affidavit as provided for in section
34-1114, Idaho Code.
(3) No person shall knowingly sign his name in the combination election
record and poll book if his residence address is not within that precinct at
the time of signing.
(4) If the residence address of a person contained in the combination
election record and poll book is incorrectly given due to an error in prepa-
ration of the combination election record and poll book, the judge shall as-
certain the correct address and make the necessary correction.
(5) The elector shall then be given the appropriate ballots which that
have been marked with the official election ballot identification and shall
be given folding instructions for such ballots.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
January 1, 2026.